Utah statutes.
17-30-2.   Subordinate officers in sheriff's office to be appointed from list -- Officers serving on effective date deemed qualified.

(1)  From and after the effective date of this act the sheriff of each county with a population of 20,000 people or more which shall regularly employ one or more peace officers shall, by and with the advice and consent of the county legislative body, and subject to the rules and regulations of the merit service commission, appoint from the classified merit service list furnished by the merit service commission, all subordinate peace officers in his department and in like manner fill all vacancies in the same and shall further promote, transfer, demote, suspend or remove peace officers in accordance with the provisions of this act.

(2)  Every peace officer who is serving as such upon the effective date of this act shall be deemed fully qualified for such position without examination or test and deemed to have been appointed and to hold his position and classification pursuant to the provisions of this act.

(3)  Counties with a population of less than 20,000 people may implement a deputy sheriff's merit system if approved by the county legislative body or the people of the county through referendum or initiative.

